Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,208
Actions to which state is a party; priority of trial; power to compel attendance of witnesses.

Civil actions to which the state is a party shall, on motion of counsel on behalf of the state, have priority of trial over other civil actions; and the several district courts having jurisdiction to try actions to which the state is a party shall have power to compel attendance of witnesses, as is now had by such courts in other civil actions, and on payment of fees and mileage at the rate provided in section 81-1176 for state employees by the party desiring their attendance, may compel the attendance of witnesses from any county within the state.

Laws 1877, § 8, p. 21;

R.S.1913, § 1184;

C.S.1922, § 1107;

C.S.1929, § 27-326;

R.S.1943, § 24-326;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 33;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-326.